Missouri, session 2026, HB1807.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 590.1450, to read as follows:
590.1450. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Mitigation measures", actions, such as jamming, that are taken to cause
electronic interference to neutralize, intercept, disable, or disrupt an unmanned aircraft
system in order to prevent illegal or harmful activity;
(2) "Nefarious manner", using an unmanned aircraft system for an illegal,
dangerous, or harmful purpose. Such purpose may include, but is not limited to, spying,
smuggling contraband, facilitating criminal activity, or posing a direct threat to public
safety.
2. A peace officer or law enforcement agency may take reasonable and necessary
mitigation measures against a threat posed by an unmanned aircraft system operating
within this state in a nefarious manner. Such measures may include, but shall not be
limited to, any of the following:
(1) The use of detection, tracking, and identification methods; and
(2) The interception or disabling of an unmanned aircraft system through legal
and safe methods including, but not limited to, jamming, hacking, or physical capture.
3. A peace officer or law enforcement agency shall act under subsection 2 of this
section only if there is reasonable suspicion that the unmanned aircraft system is
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1807 2
involved in criminal activity, poses an imminent threat to public safety, or is otherwise
operating in violation of state or federal law.
✔